Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-603
University of Nebraska or community college; faculty, administrative staff, student; dismissal or expulsion; order; contents; service.

Dismissal or expulsion of any person under section 85-601 shall be by written order, which shall contain findings of fact upon which dismissal or expulsion is based, and shall be signed by an authorized agent of the governing body. The order shall be entered within thirty days after the hearing, shall state its effective date, and shall be served by either registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to such person's current address as shown on the records of the University of Nebraska or community college.

Laws 1971, LB 445, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 114.
September 2, 2023